Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.110

Principal to assure appropriate student discipline—Building discipline standards—Classes to improve classroom management skills.

Within each school the school principal shall determine that appropriate student discipline is established and enforced. In order to assist the principal in carrying out the intent of this section, the principal and the certificated employees in a school building shall confer at least annually in order to develop and/or review building disciplinary standards and uniform enforcement of those standards. Such building standards shall be consistent with the provisions of RCW 28A.600.020(3).

School principals and certificated employees shall also confer annually, to establish criteria for determining when certificated employees must complete classes to improve classroom management skills.

[ 1997 c 266 s 12; 1990 c 33 s 379; 1980 c 171 s 2; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 97 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.58.201.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Severability—1997 c 266: See notes following RCW 28A.600.455.